Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 11 Proceedings in Probate Court

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-11-1

through

53-11-6

, and was based on Ga. L. 1966, p. 606, §§ 1-5, 7.

53-11-1.
Applicability of, and compliance with, provisions.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to any proceeding in the probate court that arises under Chapters 1 through 10, 12, and 13 of this title. Compliance with the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be sufficient for proceedings in the probate court arising under Chapters 1 through 10, 12, and 13 of this title except as otherwise provided in those chapters and in Chapter 11 of Title 9 and Chapter 9 of Title 15.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 26; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-62/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “, 12, and 13” twice in this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-11-2.
“Guardian” defined; persons represented; appointment; successors; guardian named in petitions.

As used in this Code section, the term “guardian” means the guardian ad litem appointed by the probate court who may represent a single party or more than one party or a class of parties with common or nonadverse interests, including the estates of one or more deceased heirs that have no personal representative; provided, however, that the court may determine for the purpose of the particular proceeding that the natural guardian, if any, or the testamentary guardian, if any, or the duly constituted conservator of the property, if any, or the duly constituted guardian of the person, if any, has no conflict of interest and thus may represent for the purpose of the proceeding a party who is not sui juris, who is unborn, or who is unknown.

When a party to a proceeding in the probate court is not sui juris, is unborn, or is unknown, such party shall be represented in the proceeding by a guardian. When a party to a proceeding in the probate court is a deceased heir whose estate has no personal representative, such deceased heir’s estate may be represented in the proceeding by a guardian. Service upon or notice to a guardian shall constitute service upon or notice to the party represented, and except as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-17, no additional service upon or notice to such party shall be required. Waivers, acknowledgments, consents, answers, objections, or other documents executed by the guardian shall, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 15-9-17, be binding upon the party represented.

Whenever a guardian ad litem is appointed, the court may limit the appointment or may at any time for cause appoint a successor. Unless the appointment is limited by the court, the guardian ad litem first appointed with respect to any proceeding involving the administration of the estate shall continue to serve with respect to such proceeding on behalf of the party represented until a successor is appointed, the party represented becomes sui juris, or the court terminates the appointment.

In every petition filed in the probate court, the petitioner shall specify the name of each party who requires a guardian and the name and address of any person who is acting as guardian of the party. A copy of the letters appointing the guardian shall be attached to the petition or the petition shall allege such facts as shall show the authority of such guardian to act.

The authority of a guardian to act may be established under paragraph (1) of this subsection by showing:

Compliance by a foreign guardian of a minor with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-2-74 or of Code Section 29-2-76;

Compliance by a foreign conservator of the property of a minor with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-3-115 or of Code Section 29-3-117;

Compliance by a foreign guardian of an adult with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-4-95 or of Code Section 29-4-97;

Compliance by a foreign conservator of the property of an adult with the filing requirements of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-5-135 or of Code Section 29-5-137; or

The registration and recording of a guardianship order or conservatorship order from another state under Article 4 of Chapter 11 of Title 29.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the probate court may take judicial notice of the issuance of the letters appointing such conservator or guardian, and of the authority of such conservator or guardian to act, in the manner provided by Chapter 2 of Title 24.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 27; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 44; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 41/HB 70; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-63/HB 865.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted ‘‘conservator’’ for ‘‘guardian’’ in the middle of the proviso of subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted ‘‘such’’ for ‘‘that’’ in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added a comma following ‘‘represented’’ and inserted ‘‘except as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-17,’’ in the middle, and inserted ‘‘, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 15-9-17,’’ in the third sentence; and substituted the present provisions of subsection (d) for the former provisions, which read: ‘‘In every petition filed in the probate court, the petitioner shall specify the name of each party who requires a guardian and the name and address of any person who is acting as guardian of the party. A copy of the letters appointing the guardian shall be attached to the petition or the petition shall allege such facts as shall show the authority of such guardian to act; provided, however, that the probate court may take judicial notice of the issuance of such letters or of such authority.’’

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “, including the estates of one or more deceased heirs that have no personal representative” in subsection (a); added the second sentence in subsection (b); and redesignated subparagraphs (d)(2)(i) through (d)(2)(v) as (d)(2)(A) through (d)(2)(E).

Cross references.

Appointment of guardians ad litem generally, §

9-11-17(c)

.

Guardians ad litem and appraisers for year’s support in probate court proceedings, Uniform Rules for the Probate Courts, Rule 23.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-11-3.
Personal service; generally.

Except as otherwise prescribed by law or directed by the probate judge, a party in interest who is a resident of this state is entitled to personal service of any petition and citation for proceedings that are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, personal service shall be made by delivery of a copy of the petition and citation by the sheriff or some other lawful officer at least 30 days before the hearing except that, if waived in writing or if shortened by the probate court upon good cause shown, the 30 day provision shall not apply. An entry of such service shall be made on the original and the copy for the party served.

A party who is in the military service may be served by any commissioned officer who shall file with the probate court a certificate stating that copies of the petition and citation were served in person.

Individuals who are not sui juris shall be served as provided in this chapter or as provided in Code Section 15-9-17.

When personal service is required by this Code section, unless otherwise directed by the probate court, service may be made by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery if the petitioner so requests in the petition. The court shall cause a copy of the petition and the citation to be sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery with return receipt requested and with delivery restricted to addressee only. If the return receipt is not signed by the addressee, dated at least 30 days before the date specified in the citation, except where shortened by the court upon good cause shown, and received by the court before the date specified in the citation for the filing of objections, service shall be made as otherwise required by this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 45; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-64/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “30” for “ten” and substituted “or if shortened by the probate court upon good cause shown, the 30 day” for “, the ten day” and in subsection (e), in the last sentence, substituted “30” for “ten” and inserted “except where shortened by the court upon good cause shown,”.

Cross references.

Service of process generally, §

9-11-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

53-11-4.
Service of notice where person or residence unknown, or resides outside state.

Except as otherwise prescribed by law or directed by the probate judge pursuant to Code Section 53-11-5, the provisions of this Code section shall apply in cases when a person to be served with notice of a proceeding covered by this chapter has a known current residence address outside this state, or whose current residence address is unknown.

Unless all such persons have known current residence addresses, the probate court shall order service of notice to be perfected by publication of the citation in the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published in the county in which the petition is made. The citation shall be published once a week for four weeks prior to the date on which objections must be filed. The records of the court shall show the persons served with notice and the character of such service of notice. The published citation shall be directed to the person to be served with such notice.

If the current residence address of such a person is known, the court shall cause service of notice to be made by mailing by certified or registered mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, a copy of the petition and the citation.

When service of notice by publication is ordered by the court pursuant to this Code section, compliance with the provisions of this Code section relating to a person to be served with notice who is known but whose current residence address is unknown shall be equivalent to personal service of a copy of the petition and citation when the fact appears in the records of the court showing the persons served with notice and the character of such service of notice. In the case of a known person whose current residence address is unknown, that person’s name shall appear in the records of the court, and such records shall confirm compliance with this Code section as to that person. In any case in which service of notice by publication is granted by the court, one order for service of notice by publication shall be sufficient and the published citation shall be directed as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 28; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 6; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-65/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “with notice of a proceeding covered by this chapter” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), inserted “of notice” in the first sentence, in the third sentence, substituted “served with notice” for “notified” and “such service of notice” for “the notice given”, and inserted “with such notice” at the end of the last sentence; substituted “the court shall cause service of notice to” for “service shall” in subsection (c); and, in subsection (d), in the first sentence, inserted “of notice”, inserted “by the court”, substituted “served with notice” for “notified” twice, and substituted “such service of notice” for “the notice given”, in the second sentence, substituted “confirm” for “show as to that person’s” and inserted “as to that person” at the end, and in the last sentence, inserted “of notice”, “by the court” and “service of notice by”.

Cross references.

Service of process generally, §

9-11-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-11-5.
Additional service of citation or other notice.

On the motion of any party in interest or on its own motion, the probate court may direct any additional service of citation or other notice or extend the time to respond with respect to any proceedings covered by this chapter as the judge may determine to be proper in the interests of due process and reasonable opportunity for any party or interest to be heard.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 29; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-66/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “On the motion of any party in interest or on its own motion, the probate court” for “The probate judge”, and substituted “service of citation or other notice” for “service or notice” in this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

53-11-6.
Waiver or acknowledgment of service of citation or other notice; consent to granting of relief or entry of order.

Service of citation or other notice may be waived or acknowledged before or after the filing of the petition. The waiver or acknowledgment shall be in a writing signed by the person to be served with notice or some person authorized by the person to be served with such notice, shall be sworn to or affirmed before the probate court or a notary public, and shall be filed with the probate court.

Except as otherwise prescribed by law, the written consent of a party to the granting of any relief or the entry of any order sought in a proceeding covered by this chapter, whether executed before or after the filing of the petition, shall constitute a waiver and acknowledgment of service of notice of the proceedings, waiver of any other or further citation or service of notice, entry of appearance, answer admitting all allegations of fact set forth in the petition as true and correct, and consent to the granting of the relief or the order sought.

A person in military service, regardless of age, shall be permitted to make any waiver, acknowledgment, or consent described in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 30; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 46; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-67/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, substituted “Service of citation or other notice” for “Service or notice”, in the second sentence, inserted “with notice” and inserted “with such notice”; and, in subsection (b), inserted “covered by this chapter,”, substituted “service of notice of” for “notice and service of”, and substituted “any other or further citation or service of notice” for “citation”.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-11-7.
Officers authorized to administer oath or affirmation or affidavit.

An oath or affirmation or affidavit required or allowed to be made before or attested by a notary public may be made before any notary public or other officer authorized to administer oaths by the state in which the oath or affirmation or affidavit is made. The oath or affirmation or affidavit, if made outside this state, shall have the same force and effect as if it had been made before an officer of this state authorized to administer oaths. The official attestation of the officer before whom the oath or affirmation or affidavit is made shall be prima-facie evidence of the official character of the officer and that the officer was authorized by law to administer oaths.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-11-8.
Verification of petitions.

Every petition filed in the probate court shall be verified by the oath of the petitioner and shall be sworn to or affirmed before the probate court or a notary public.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-11-9.
Issuance of citation upon filing of petition; contents; meaning; definitions; caveat or objection.

Upon the filing of a petition, a citation shall be issued by the court and addressed to the persons required to be served with notice or who otherwise are to be served with notice; provided, however, that if all such persons have acknowledged service of notice and assented to the petition, no such citation need issue. Such citation shall state that any objection must be made in writing and shall designate the date on or before which objections must be filed in the probate court. Such citation also shall state whether the hearing will take place on a certain date or be specially scheduled for a later date. With respect to all proceedings under this title, any such citation may state that if no objections are filed the petition may be granted without a hearing.

For purposes of this chapter, the words “citation” and “notice” shall have the same meaning unless the context otherwise requires.

Wherever appearing in this title with respect to proceedings in the probate court covered by this chapter:

The terms “service of notice,” “given notice,” “due notice,” “notified,” and similar words and phrases of the same import shall mean service of petition and citation in a manner provided by applicable law, and shall include acknowledgment or waiver of such service and such service upon a guardian ad litem or other appropriate representative, unless the context otherwise requires;

The terms “the official county newspaper,” “the newspaper in which sheriff’s advertisements are published,” “the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made,” “the official newspaper of the county in which the personal representative qualified,” and similar words and phrases of the same import shall mean the journal or newspaper qualified or designated as the official legal organ of the county of the probate court having jurisdiction in such proceeding pursuant to Code Section 9-13-142;

The terms “published,” “publication,” “service by publication,” “notice shall be published,” and similar words and phrases of the same import shall mean publication in the official legal organ described in paragraph (2) of this subsection unless the context otherwise requires;

The term “beneficiary” shall include devisee and legatee unless the context otherwise requires;

Any hearing called for in any proceeding shall be within the court’s sound discretion and shall not be required if no caveat or objection is timely filed and thereafter maintained unless the context otherwise requires; and

Any requirement that no caveat or objection be filed:

Shall be satisfied by the dismissal or withdrawal of all caveats or objections so filed unless the context otherwise requires; and

May, in the court’s sound discretion, be satisfied by the failure of any party served with notice to file a caveat or objection in a timely manner unless the context otherwise requires.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 31; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 47; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-68/HB 865; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 53/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted “by the court and”, substituted “with notice or who otherwise are to be served with” for “or entitled to”, inserted “that”, substituted “such persons” for “parties”, inserted “of notice”, and inserted “such”; inserted “Such” for “The” in the second and third sentences, and substituted “any such citation” for “the citation, if any,” in the last sentence; and added subsection (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “The terms” for “The term” at the beginning of paragraphs (c)(1), (c)(2), and (c)(3).

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-11-10.
Date by which objections must be filed or on which hearing will be held.

Except as otherwise prescribed by law or as shortened by the judge upon good cause shown or directed by the judge pursuant to Code Section 53-11-5 with respect to any particular proceeding, the date on or before which any person is required to file any objection shall be not fewer than 30 days after the date such person is personally served with notice. For a person within the continental United States who is served with notice by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed by such person shall not be fewer than 30 days from the date of mailing of such service of notice; provided, however, that if a return receipt from any recipient is received by the court within 30 days from such date of mailing of such service of notice, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed by such recipient shall be 30 days from the date of receipt of such service of notice shown on such return receipt. For a person outside the continental United States who is served with notice by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed by such person shall not be fewer than 30 days from the date the service of the citation is mailed by the court; provided, however, that if the return receipt from any such recipient is received by the court during such 30 day period the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed by such recipient shall not be earlier than 30 days from the date of such recipient’s receipt of such service of notice shown on such return receipt. For a person served with notice by publication, the date on or before which any objection is required to be filed shall be no earlier than the first day of the week following such service by publication of citation once each week for four weeks.

Except as otherwise prescribed by law or directed by the judge with respect to any particular proceeding, the date on which any required hearing shall be held shall be the date by which any objection is required to be filed or such later date as the probate court may specify. When the matter is set for hearing on a date that was not specified in the citation, the probate court shall serve by first-class mail a notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to the petitioner and all parties who have filed responses to the petition at the addresses given by them in their pleadings.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 32; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-69/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted “as shortened by the judge upon good cause shown or”, substituted “person” for “objection”, substituted “file any objection” for “be filed”, substituted “fewer than 30 days” for “less than ten days”, substituted “such” for “the”, and inserted “with notice” at the end, in the second sentence, substituted “a person” for “persons”, substituted “is served with notice” for “are served”, inserted “which” twice, inserted “by such person”, substituted “fewer than 30 days” for “less than 13 days”, inserted “of such service of notice” three times, substituted “30 days from such” for “13 days from the”, and substituted “30” for “ten”; in the third sentence, inserted “with notice”, inserted “which”, inserted “by such person”, substituted “fewer” for “less”, inserted “service of the”, inserted “by the court”, inserted “such”, substituted “30 days” for “ten days”, and substituted “such recipient’s receipt of such service of notice” for “receipt”, and in the last sentence, inserted “with notice”, substituted “earlier” for “sooner”, and substituted “such service by publication of citation” for “publication”; and in subsection (b), in the last sentence, substituted “serve” for “send”, substituted “date, time, and place” for “time”, and substituted “filed responses to the petition” for “served responses”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

53-11-11.
Authentication or exemplification of document.

Whenever it is required that a document to be filed in the probate court be authenticated or exemplified, such requirement shall be met by complying with the provisions of Code Section 24-9-922 and such full faith and credit shall be given to the document as is provided in that Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-11-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 100/HB 24; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 53/HB 90.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).